src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper noun inflection
! ----------------------
!! The Võro language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON PROP_
+N+Prop:   # ;

LEXICON PROP_1HANSʼA !!= @CODE@ 1 hansʼa:hansʼa
 PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_1HANSʼA-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_1HANSʼA-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_1HANSʼA-SG
+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_1HANSʼA-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_1HANSʼA-PL
+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_1HANSʼA-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_1VIU !!= @CODE@ 1 viu:viu
 PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@	PROP_1VIU-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@	PROP_1VIU-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_1VIU-SG
+N+Prop:%{back%}	NMN_1VIU-SG ; 
LEXICON PROP_1VIU-PL
+N+Prop:%{back%}	NMN_1VIU-PL ; 


LEXICON PROP_1HERRÄ !!= @CODE@ 1 herrä:herrä
 PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@	PROP_1HERRÄ-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@	PROP_1HERRÄ-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_1HERRÄ-SG
+N+Prop:%{front%}	NMN_1HERRÄ-SG ; 
LEXICON PROP_1HERRÄ-PL
+N+Prop:%{front%}	NMN_1HERRÄ-PL ; 

!LEXICON PROP_1PREI !!= @CODE@ 1 prei:prei
! PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! @U.Cap.Obl@	PROP_1PREI-SG ;
! @U.Cap.Obl@	PROP_1PREI-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_1PREI-SG
!+N+Prop:	NMN_1PREI-SG ; 
!LEXICON PROP_1PREI-PL
!+N+Prop:	NMN_1PREI-PL ; 

LEXICON PROP_2ARTIKLI
!! * Yaml: __suhvli__
 PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_2ARTIKLI-SG ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_2ARTIKLI-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_2ARTIKLI-SG
+N+Prop:%{back%}	NMN_2ARTIKLI-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_2ARTIKLI-PL
+N+Prop:%{back%}	NMN_2ARTIKLI-PL ;


LEXICON PROP_2KERGE
!! * Yaml: __kerge__
 PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_2KERGE-SG ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_2KERGE-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_2KERGE-SG
+N+Prop:%{front%}	NMN_2KERGE-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_2KERGE-PL
+N+Prop:%{front%}	NMN_2KERGE-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_3PERÄDÜ !!= @CODE@ perädü:perädü
!!! * Yaml: __peraedue__
! PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_3PERÄDÜ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_3PERÄDÜ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_3PERÄDÜ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_3PERÄDÜ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_3PERÄDÜ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_3PERÄDÜ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_3ALADU !!= @CODE@ aladu:aladu
!! * Yaml: __peraedue__
! PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_3ALADU-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_3ALADU-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_3ALADU-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_3ALADU-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_3ALADU-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_3ALADU-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_4TERVÜS
!! * Yaml: __tervues__
! PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_4TERVÜS-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_4TERVÜS-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_4TERVÜS-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_4TERVÜS-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_4TERVÜS-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_4TERVÜS-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_4AINUS
!! * Yaml: __A-ainus__
! PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_4AINUS-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_4AINUS-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_4AINUS-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_4AINUS-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_4AINUS-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_4AINUS-PL ;


LEXICON PROP_5OPPAJA
!! * Yaml: __N-oppaja5__
 PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_5OPPAJA-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_5OPPAJA-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_5OPPAJA-SG
+N+Prop:%{back%}	NMN_5OPPAJA/MÄNGJÄ-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_5OPPAJA-PL
+N+Prop:%{back%}	NMN_5OPPAJA/MÄNGJÄ-PL ;


LEXICON PROP_5MÄNGJÄ
!! * Yaml: __N-oppaja5__
 PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_5MÄNGJÄ-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_5MÄNGJÄ-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_5MÄNGJÄ-SG
+N+Prop:%{front%}	NMN_5OPPAJA/MÄNGJÄ-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_5MÄNGJÄ-PL
+N+Prop:%{front%}	NMN_5OPPAJA/MÄNGJÄ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_6MAKÕ
! PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_6MAKÕ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_6MAKÕ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_6MAKÕ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_6MAKÕ/HELLE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_6MAKÕ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_6MAKÕ/HELLE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_7FÜÜSIGA
!! * Yaml: __fueuesiga__
! PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_7FÜÜSIGA-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_7FÜÜSIGA-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_7FÜÜSIGA-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_7FÜÜSIGA-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_7FÜÜSIGA-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_7FÜÜSIGA-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_8KASK
!:a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8KASK-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8KASK-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_8KASK-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_8KASK/HÄIELM-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_8KASK-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_8KASK/HÄIELM-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_8HÄIELM
!:ä PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8HÄIELM-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8HÄIELM-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_8HÄIELM-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_8KASK/HÄIELM-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_8HÄIELM-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_8KASK/HÄIELM-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_8DOLLARʼ
:ä PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8DOLLARʼ-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8DOLLARʼ-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_8DOLLARʼ-SG
+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_8DOLLARʼ/EEDERʼ-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_8DOLLARʼ-PL
+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_8DOLLARʼ/EEDERʼ-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_8EEDERʼ
:ä PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8EEDERʼ-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_8EEDERʼ-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_8EEDERʼ-SG
+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_8DOLLARʼ/EEDERʼ-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_8EEDERʼ-PL
+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_8DOLLARʼ/EEDERʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_36SILM !!= * @CODE@ silm:silm
!! harmony: front
!:ä PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_36SILM-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_36SILM-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_36SILM-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_36SILM-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_36SILM-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_36SILM-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_9KIPÕNʼ
!! kipõnʼ:kipõnʼ
!! * Yaml: __N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9__
!:%^Pen%^WGStem%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_9KIPÕNʼ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_9KIPÕNʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_9KIPÕNʼ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_9KIPÕNʼ/VETELʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_9KIPÕNʼ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_9KIPÕNʼ/VETELʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_9SALLAI
!! sallai:sallai
!! * Yaml: __N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9__
!:%^Pen%^WGStem%>ä PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_9SALLAI-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_9SALLAI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_9SALLAI-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}	NMN_9SALLAI/ELLÄI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_9SALLAI-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}	NMN_9SALLAI/ELLÄI-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_9ELLÄI
!! elläi:elläi
!! * Yaml: __N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9__
!:%^Pen%^WGStem%>ä PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_9ELLÄI-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_9ELLÄI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_9ELLÄI-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}	NMN_9SALLAI/ELLÄI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_9ELLÄI-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}	NMN_9SALLAI/ELLÄI-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_9TUKÕV
!! tukõv:tukõv
!! * Yaml: __N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9__
:%^Pen%^WGStem%>ä PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_9TUKÕV-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@   PROP_9TUKÕV-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_9TUKÕV-SG
+N+Prop:%{back%}	NMN_9TUKÕV/VERREV-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_9TUKÕV-PL
+N+Prop:%{back%}	NMN_9TUKÕV/VERREV-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_10HÕRAK !!= @CODE@ hõrak:hõrak
!:%^WGStem%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HÕRAK-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HÕRAK-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HÕRAK-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_10HÕRAK-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HÕRAK-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_10HÕRAK-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_10AMEERIGA !!= @CODE@ Ameeriga:Ameerik
!! cf. _10HÕRAK
:%^WGStem%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10AMEERIGA-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10AMEERIGA-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_10AMEERIGA-SG
+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_10AMEERIGA-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_10AMEERIGA-PL
+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_10AMEERIGA-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_10HAIDAK !!= @CODE@ haidak:haidak
!:%^WGStem%>u PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HAIDAK-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HAIDAK-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HAIDAK-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_10HAIDAK-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HAIDAK-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_10HAIDAK-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_10ESÄK !!= @CODE@ esäk:esäk
!:%^WGStem%>u PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10ESÄK-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10ESÄK-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_10ESÄK-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_10ESÄK-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_10ESÄK-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_10ESÄK-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_10VIDRIK !!= @CODE@ vidrik:vidrik
!! gradation: no
:%^WGStem%>u PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10VIDRIK-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10VIDRIK-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_10VIDRIK-SG
+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_10VIDRIK-SG ;
